udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX V2 Y 200 # -[^й]ыны
SFX V2 ыны он/N2 [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны оно [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны е [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны # [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны елэ [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ем/N2 [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емед [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емын [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емен [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емысь [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны еме [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емез [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны еммы [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емзы [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емды [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емдэ [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емдэс [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емзэ [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емзэс [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емме [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны еммес [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емпотонтэм [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емпотостэм [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны емъёстэ [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны и [^дзлнстьй]ыны # [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ид [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иды [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны из [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны изы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны им [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны имы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны исез [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ись/N2 [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иськиз [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны исько [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иськод [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иськоды [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иськом [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иськомы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны исьтэм [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иськем [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иськеммы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иллям [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иллямды [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иллямзы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иллямтэ [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иськы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иське [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иськымтэе [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны иськымтэмы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны э [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны # [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны элэ [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмед [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эм/N2 [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмын [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмен [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмысь [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эме [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмез [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмзы [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмды [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмзэ [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмзэс [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмдэ [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмдэс [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмме [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эммес [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эммы [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмпотонтэм [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмпотостэм [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны эмъёстэ [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥ [дзлнст]ыны # [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥд [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥды [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥз [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥзы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥм [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥмы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥсез [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥсь/N2 [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥськиз [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥсько [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥськод [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥськоды [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥськом [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥськомы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥсьтэм [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥськем [дзлнст]ыны	
SFX V2 ыны ӥськеммы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥллям [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥллямды [дзлнст]ыны	
SFX V2 ыны ӥллямзы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥллямтэ [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥськы [дзлнст]ыны	
SFX V2 ыны ӥське [дзлнст]ыны	
SFX V2 ыны ӥськымтэе [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ӥськымтэмы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX V2 ыны о [^ьй]ыны # [^ь]ыны
SFX V2 ыны од [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны оды [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны оз [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны озы [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ом [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны омы [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны онлэсь [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны онтэм [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны онэз [^ьй]ыны
SFX V2 ыны 0 [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX V2 ыны ы [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ыны 0 [уеыаоэяиюӧӥё][цклгшхфвпржмбдзнтсчщӝӵӟ]ыны
SFX V2 ьыны ён/N2 ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ёно ьыны # ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны е ьыны			
SFX V2 ьыны елэ ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ем/N2 ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емед ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емын ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емен ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емысь ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны еме ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емез ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емзы ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емды ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емзэ ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емзэс ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емдэ ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емдэс ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емме ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны еммес ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны еммы ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емпотонтэм ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емпотостэм ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны емъёстэ ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны и ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ид ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иды ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны из ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны изы ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны им ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны имы ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны исез ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ись/N2 ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иськиз ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны исько ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иськод ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иськоды ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иськом ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иськомы ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны исьтэм ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иськем ьыны	
SFX V2 ьыны иськеммы ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иллям ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иллямды ьыны	
SFX V2 ьыны иллямзы ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иллямтэ ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иськы ьыны	
SFX V2 ьыны иське ьыны	
SFX V2 ьыны иськымтэе ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны иськымтэмы ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ё ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ёд ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ёды ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ёз ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ёзы ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ём ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ёмы ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ёнлэсь ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ёнтэм ьыны
SFX V2 ьыны ёнэз ьыны		
SFX V2 ны мон [^й]ыны # ыны
SFX V2 ны мтэ [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны мтэзэ [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны мтэдэ [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны мтэез [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны са [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны сал [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны салыд [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны салыз [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны салмы [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны салды [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны салзы [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны тэк [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны ку [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны кум [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны кумы [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны куд [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны куды [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны куз [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны кузы [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны тозь [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны тозям [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны тозямы [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны тозяд [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны тозяды [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны тозяз [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны тозязы [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны мтэен [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны мтэысь [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны лэм [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны лэме [^й]ыны
SFX V2 ны лэмме [^й]ыны
