udm.dic
адӟиськыны/V1V2
адырыны/V1V2
азгырмылыны/V1V2
азъяськыны/V1V2
азьвылтылыны/V1V2
азьлапалскыны/V1V2
азьтэмтӥськыны/V1V2
актэмъяськыны/V1V2
алдатыны/V1V2
алыны/V1V2
амалтыны/V1V2
анкыны/V1V2
арттырыны/V1V2
ашданыны/V1V2
бадӟыматылыны/V1V2
бакомылыны/V1V2
басыны/V1V2
бачкылыны/V1V2
бекырскылыны/V1V2
бералтылыны/V1V2
беромылыны/V1V2
берыкъятыны/V1V2
бинялскылыны/V1V2
бичалляськыны/V1V2
бичпотыны/V1V2
бӧльыны/V1V2
бӧрӟытыны/V1V2
бугъяськыны/V1V2
будӟиаськыны/V1V2
буйгатӥськыны/V1V2
бульккетыны/V1V2
буратыны/V1V2
бурмытыны/V1V2
бушатӥськыны/V1V2
буятылыны/V1V2
быдӟымъяськыны/V1V2
быдэсмытыны/V1V2
бызырмыны/V1V2
быректылыны/V1V2
бырттытыны/V1V2
бышкалтӥськыны/V1V2
ваземъяськыны/V1V2
вайяськылыны/V1V2
валатскылыны/V1V2
валтыны/V1V2
ваменпуаськыны/V1V2
вамышъятыны/V1V2
ваньмытскылыны/V1V2
васькытыны/V1V2
вачеятыны/V1V2
вейектыны/V1V2
веньятыны/V1V2
веськатӥськылыны/V1V2
веттаськытыны/V1V2
визьмаськытылыны/V1V2
викыны/V1V2
виртэммыны/V1V2
витьыны/V1V2
вогланыны/V1V2
вожвылтӥськыны/V1V2
вожоаськыны/V1V2
воӟкыны/V1V2
возьматскылыны/V1V2
вӧлдыны/V1V2
вӧлмытыны/V1V2
вольытомытӥськыны/V1V2
вонялтыны/V1V2
вордытыны/V1V2
ворттӥськылыны/V1V2
восьмытыны/V1V2
воштӥськыны/V1V2
вуатыны/V1V2
вужертыны/V1V2
вузкарытыны/V1V2
вукылмытыны/V1V2
вурӟытылыны/V1V2
вутэмӟыны/V1V2
вуыны/V1V2
выжылыны/V1V2
вылляськыны/V1V2
выльмыны/V1V2
вырӟытылыны/V1V2
галяськыны/V1V2
гаӵолӥнтӥськыны/V1V2
герӟаськылыны/V1V2
гожкыны/V1V2
гожъятыны/V1V2
гомӟытыны/V1V2
гордмыны/V1V2
губиӟыны/V1V2
гудӟиськылыны/V1V2
гужатыны/V1V2
гуньдыны/V1V2
гуштыны/V1V2
гылӟылыны/V1V2
гылытомытыны/V1V2
гыркъяськыны/V1V2
даллашыны/V1V2
дарекъяськыны/V1V2
дӥниськыны/V1V2
долӟыны/V1V2
донгатыны/V1V2
дугдытыны/V1V2
дуномытыны/V1V2
дурвайылыны/V1V2
дуръятыны/V1V2
дыгылыны/V1V2
дыртытыны/V1V2
дэймытылыны/V1V2
егитмылыны/V1V2
ериськылыны/V1V2
ёзнаськыны/V1V2
ёркытомылыны/V1V2
ёртытыны/V1V2
жагдылыны/V1V2
жагтыны/V1V2
жалькмыны/V1V2
жаритьтыны/V1V2
ӝикытатыны/V1V2
жильыяськылыны/V1V2
жичомытылыны/V1V2
ӝогомыны/V1V2
ӝожтӥськылыны/V1V2
ӝоктытыны/V1V2
ӝоместылыны/V1V2
ӝуатӥськылыны/V1V2
жужгетыны/V1V2
жуматскыны/V1V2
ӝуткатыны/V1V2
ӝуяськыны/V1V2
ӟабыльтыны/V1V2
замокатыны/V1V2
зарнияськыны/V1V2
ӟезьыны/V1V2
ӟечыратыны/V1V2
зӥбытомылыны/V1V2
ӟизатылыны/V1V2
ӟингыльтыны/V1V2
зӧкомылыны/V1V2
золтӥськылыны/V1V2
ӟоскатыны/V1V2
ӟугырскылыны/V1V2
ӟудыны/V1V2
зульылыны/V1V2
зуркеттыны/V1V2
ӟыгырскылыны/V1V2
зымкылыны/V1V2
зынъяськыны/V1V2
зырӟылыны/V1V2
ивортӥськыны/V1V2
изъянтылыны/V1V2
изьыятыны/V1V2
интыятыны/V1V2
иськыныны/V1V2
ичиятыны/V1V2
ишкылыны/V1V2
йӧкуштыны/V1V2
йӧнтэмъяськылыны/V1V2
йӧтылыны/V1V2
йыгаськылыны/V1V2
йылсатыны/V1V2
йылэтытыны/V1V2
йырйиськыны/V1V2
йырсазьяськылыны/V1V2
йырчукинтылыны/V1V2
кагыны/V1V2
калгылыны/V1V2
калтыртыны/V1V2
канӟектыны/V1V2
капчиёмылыны/V1V2
капчиятылыны/V1V2
картъяськыны/V1V2
катьсатыны/V1V2
кегыны/V1V2
кезьытомылыны/V1V2
кекатытыны/V1V2
кельышыны/V1V2
кенераськыны/V1V2
кенжытылӥськыны/V1V2
керектылыны/V1V2
керттӥськылыны/V1V2
кесьыны/V1V2
кечыльскыны/V1V2
кивалтосъяськыны/V1V2
кизертыны/V1V2
кильтыръяськылыны/V1V2
кисальмыны/V1V2
киськаськылыны/V1V2
китырыны/V1V2
клоккетыны/V1V2
кожытылыны/V1V2
кокчатыны/V1V2
колӟаськылыны/V1V2
колытыны/V1V2
конялӟыны/V1V2
кораськытыны/V1V2
кӧсатыны/V1V2
котмыны/V1V2
котыртылыны/V1V2
кӧшкематыны/V1V2
куалгытыны/V1V2
куарсаськылыны/V1V2
куасьтытылыны/V1V2
кужмоятскыны/V1V2
кузялмыны/V1V2
кульчояськыны/V1V2
куноятылыны/V1V2
курадӟытӥськыны/V1V2
курсыныны/V1V2
кусӥнъяськылыны/V1V2
кутырыны/V1V2
куштӥськылыны/V1V2
кыжмытыны/V1V2
кылиськылыны/V1V2
кымалтӥськылыны/V1V2
кынтыны/V1V2
кырсатыны/V1V2
кыскаськыны/V1V2
кыӵесатыны/V1V2
ладъяськылыны/V1V2
лапегатыны/V1V2
лашкинтылыны/V1V2
лёгаськытыны/V1V2
лӧбыртыны/V1V2
лосыртылыны/V1V2
лулъяськытыны/V1V2
луыны/V1V2
лызмаськыны/V1V2
лэзькыны/V1V2
люкалляськыны/V1V2
лябмыны/V1V2
мажсаськытыны/V1V2
мамыкъяськылыны/V1V2
матэтскытыны/V1V2
мекалтӥськыны/V1V2
месӥськыны/V1V2
могатыны/V1V2
мугатыны/V1V2
мултэстӥськыны/V1V2
мушкиськылыны/V1V2
мыкыръяськытыны/V1V2
мырӟытыны/V1V2
мяуктыны/V1V2
напырӟытыны/V1V2
нелькытыны/V1V2
нимазъяськытыны/V1V2
нӧдаськыны/V1V2
нордыны/V1V2
нуныятыны/V1V2
ныралтыны/V1V2
ньылӟытыны/V1V2
нюпырестыны/V1V2
нярӟылыны/V1V2
огазеяськылыны/V1V2
ӧжытатыны/V1V2
омырскылыны/V1V2
ортчытыны/V1V2
ӧтьылыны/V1V2
паймытылыны/V1V2
пальмыны/V1V2
париськыны/V1V2
пачылмылыны/V1V2
пеймытомыны/V1V2
пересьмыны/V1V2
пиетыны/V1V2
письыны/V1V2
погыльскылыны/V1V2
позыръяськыны/V1V2
пормыны/V1V2
посӥськыны/V1V2
правитьтыны/V1V2
пуксьыны/V1V2
пульыяськылыны/V1V2
пуньырскыны/V1V2
пурыны/V1V2
пуштытӥськыны/V1V2
пызйиськылыны/V1V2
пыльккетыны/V1V2
пыртылыны/V1V2
ракатланыны/V1V2
сазьтӥськытыны/V1V2
салиськылыны/V1V2
сапыльӟыны/V1V2
саюлъяськыны/V1V2
сётылыны/V1V2
синтӥськыны/V1V2
сисьтылыны/V1V2
сопкетылыны/V1V2
сузымытыны/V1V2
сулятыны/V1V2
сурыкмыны/V1V2
сыркомыны/V1V2
сьӧсьяськыны/V1V2
сэрттӥськыны/V1V2
сюреласькыны/V1V2
тазатскыны/V1V2
таркаськыны/V1V2
тӥялляськыны/V1V2
тодылыны-адӟылыны/V1V2
тӧлатыны/V1V2
торегъяськыны/V1V2
тугылыны/V1V2
тукырӟылыны/V1V2
тунатыны/V1V2
тутыктырыны/V1V2
тылскытыны/V1V2
тыртылыны/V1V2
тэкшерылыны/V1V2
тэчылыны/V1V2
удатыны/V1V2
узыны/V1V2
уйсырмыны/V1V2
улӟытскыны/V1V2
ульыкмытыны/V1V2
уноятылыны/V1V2
урдытыны/V1V2
урттылӥськылыны/V1V2
уськытскылыны/V1V2
утчалляськыны/V1V2
учкемъяськыны/V1V2
ӵабтыны/V1V2
чажгырыны/V1V2
чальдыны/V1V2
чатыръяськыны/V1V2
ӵематыны/V1V2
черсӥськыны/V1V2
чигылыны/V1V2
чильтыръяськыны/V1V2
ӵогалляськыны/V1V2
ӵоксатыны/V1V2
чоръяськыны/V1V2
ӵужектылыны/V1V2
чукыны/V1V2
чуртналляськыны/V1V2
чутыртыны/V1V2
ӵыжалтӥськылыны/V1V2
чылкытатылыны/V1V2
чырткемъяськыны/V1V2
шакыртыны/V1V2
шарккетылыны/V1V2
шелепаськыны/V1V2
шертытыны/V1V2
шобыръяськытыны/V1V2
шоккесъяськылыны/V1V2
шонаськытыны/V1V2
шорӟытылыны/V1V2
шугъяськылыны/V1V2
шукырскытыны/V1V2
шульыкмытыны/V1V2
шупатскыны/V1V2
шуылыны/V1V2
шымыртӥськыны/V1V2
шырытыны/V1V2
ынъяськылыны/V1V2
ыштӥськылыны/V1V2
элегъяськылыны/V1V2
эскерылыны/V1V2
югдытскылыны/V1V2
юзытомыны/V1V2
юргетыны/V1V2
юскиськыны/V1V2
янгыштыны/V1V2
бераланьтыны/V1V2 # С.М.
